Utah statutes.
63G-6a-610.   Contracts awarded by reverse auction.

(1)  Reverse auction bidding may be used if the procurement officer determines, in writing, that reverse auction bidding will provide the best value to the procurement unit.

(2)  Reverse auction bidding is appropriate to use when there are multiple prequalified providers of a procurement item.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

